Colorado statutes. TITLE 5 Consumer Credit Code
PART 5
LIMITATION ON AGREEMENTS AND PRACTICES

5-10-501. Acquiring ownership.

At any time after the first lease payment is made, the lessee may acquire ownership of the property under the terms specified in the rental purchase agreement.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 370, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

5-10-502. Prohibited provisions.

A rental purchase agreement shall not contain a provision requiring any of the following:

Assignment of earnings. No lessor shall accept an assignment of earnings from the lessee for payment or as security for payment of a charge arising out of a rental purchase agreement. An assignment of earnings in violation of this paragraph (a) is unenforceable by the assignee of the earnings and revocable by the lessee. This paragraph (a) shall not prohibit a lessee from voluntarily authorizing deductions from his earnings if the authorization is revocable and otherwise permitted by law.

Authorization to confess judgment. No lessor shall take or accept a power of attorney or other authorization from the lessee, or other person acting on his behalf, to confess judgment.

Waivers. No lessor may require a lessee to waive service of process or to waive any defense, counterclaim, or right of action against the lessor, or a person acting on the lessor's behalf as the lessor's agent in collection of payments under the lease or in the repossession of the lease property.

Breach of the peace. No lessor may require a lessee to authorize the lessor or a person acting on the lessor's behalf to enter unlawfully upon the lessee's premises or to commit any breach of the peace in the repossession of the lease property.

Garnishment of wages. No lessor may require a lessee to authorize a prejudgment garnishment of the lessee's wages.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 370, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

5-10-503. Balloon payments.

A lessee shall not be required to make a payment in addition to regular lease payments in order to acquire ownership of the lease property, nor shall the lessee be required to pay lease payments totaling more than the cost to acquire ownership, as provided in section 5-10-401 (1)(b).

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 371, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.

5-10-504. Prohibited charges.

A lessor shall not contract for or receive charges for any of the following:

The purchase of insurance by the lessee from the lessor;

A penalty for early termination of a rental purchase agreement or for the return of an item at any point, except for those charges authorized by sections 5-10-601 and 5-10-602; or

A payment by a co-signer of the rental purchase agreement for any fees or charges which could not be imposed upon the lessee as part of the rental purchase agreement.

No payment or obligation on the part of the lessee shall accrue when the property is being repaired or replaced unless a loaner is provided to the lessee.

Source:

L. 90:

Entire article added, p. 371, § 1, effective January 1, 1991.